California statutes. Penal Code
(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

16950.

As used in Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 26350) of Division 5 of Title 4, a handgun shall be deemed to be carried openly or exposed if the handgun is not carried concealed within the meaning of Section 25400.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 725, Sec. 7.   (AB 144)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

16960.

As used in Article 1 (commencing with Section 26500) of Chapter 1 of Division 6 of Title 4, “operation of law” includes, but is not limited to, any of the following:

(a) The executor, personal representative, or administrator of an estate, if the estate includes a firearm.

(b) A secured creditor or an agent or employee of a secured creditor when a firearm is possessed as collateral for, or as a result of, a default under a security agreement under the Commercial Code.

(c) A levying officer, as defined in Section 481.140, 511.060, or 680.260 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(d) A receiver performing the functions of a receiver, if the receivership estate includes a firearm.

(e) A trustee in bankruptcy performing the duties of a trustee, if the bankruptcy estate includes a firearm.

(f) An assignee for the benefit of creditors performing the functions of an assignee, if the assignment includes a firearm.

(g) A transmutation of property between spouses pursuant to Section 850 of the Family Code.

(h) A firearm received by the family of a police officer or deputy sheriff from a local agency pursuant to Section 50081 of the Government Code.

(i) The transfer of a firearm by a law enforcement agency to the person who found the firearm where the delivery is to the person as the finder of the firearm pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 2080) of Chapter 4 of Title 6 of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code.

(j) The trustee of a trust that includes a firearm and that was part of a will that created the trust.

(k) A person acting pursuant to the person’s power of attorney in accordance with Division 4.5 (commencing with Section 4000) of the Probate Code.

(l) A limited or general conservator appointed by a court pursuant to the Probate Code or
 Welfare and Institutions Code.

(m) A guardian ad litem appointed by a court pursuant to Section 372 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(n) The trustee of a trust that includes a firearm that is under court supervision.

(o) A special administrator appointed by a court pursuant to Section 8540 of the Probate Code.

(p) A guardian appointed by a court pursuant to Section 1500 of the Probate Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 110, Sec. 1.   (AB 1292)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

16965.

As used in this part, “passenger’s or driver’s area” means that part of a motor vehicle which is designed to carry the driver and passengers, including any interior compartment or space therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

16970.

(a) As used in Sections 16790, 17505, and 30600, “person” means an individual, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, association, or any other group or entity, regardless of how it was created.

(b) As used in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 30500) of Division 10 of Title 4, except for Section 30600, “person” means an individual.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 71, Sec. 134.   (SB 1304)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

16980.

Use of the term “person licensed pursuant to Sections 26700 to 26915, inclusive” is governed by Section 26700.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

16990.

As used in any provision listed in subdivision (a) of Section 16585, the phrase “a person taking title or possession of a firearm by operation of law” includes, but is not limited to, any of the following instances in which an individual receives title to, or possession of, a firearm:

(a) The executor, personal representative, or administrator of an estate, if the estate includes a firearm.

(b) A secured creditor or an agent or employee of a secured creditor when the firearm is possessed as collateral for, or as a result of, a default under a security agreement under the Commercial Code.

(c) A levying officer, as defined in Section 481.140, 511.060, or 680.260 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(d) A receiver performing the functions of a receiver, if the receivership estate includes a firearm.

(e) A trustee in bankruptcy performing the duties of a trustee, if the bankruptcy estate includes a firearm.

(f) An assignee for the benefit of creditors performing the functions of an assignee, if the assignment includes a firearm.

(g) A transmutation of property consisting of a firearm pursuant to Section 850 of the Family Code.

(h) A firearm passing to a surviving spouse pursuant to Chapter 1
 (commencing with Section 13500) of Part 2 of Division 8 of the Probate Code.

(i) A firearm received by the family of a police officer or deputy sheriff from a local agency pursuant to Section 50081 of the Government Code.

(j) The transfer of a firearm by a law enforcement agency to the person who found the firearm where the delivery is to the person as the finder of the firearm pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 2080) of Chapter 4 of Title 6 of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code.

(k) The trustee of a trust that includes a firearm and that was part of a will that created the trust.

(l) A firearm passed to a decedent’s successor pursuant to Part
 1 (commencing with Section 13000) of Division 8 of the Probate Code.

(m) A person acting pursuant to the person’s power of attorney in accordance with Division 4.5 (commencing with Section 4000) of the Probate Code.

(n) A limited or general conservator appointed by a court pursuant to the Probate Code or Welfare and Institutions Code.

(o) A guardian ad litem appointed by a court pursuant to Section 372 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(p) The trustee of a trust that includes a firearm that is under court supervision.

(q) The trustee of a trust that is not referenced in subdivisions
 (k) or (p).

(r) A special administrator appointed by a court pursuant to Section 8540 of the Probate Code.

(s) A guardian appointed by a court pursuant to Section 1500 of the Probate Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 110, Sec. 2.   (AB 1292)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

17000.

(a) As used in this part, until January 1, 2014, any reference to the term “personal firearm importer” shall be deemed to mean “personal handgun importer” and, on and after January 1, 2014, any reference to the term “personal handgun importer” shall be deemed to mean “personal firearm importer.” A “personal handgun importer,” until January 1, 2014, and commencing January 1, 2014, a “personal firearm importer” means an individual who meets all of the following criteria:

(1) The individual is not a person licensed pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 26700) and Article 2 (commencing with Section 26800) of Chapter 2 of Division 6 of Title 4.

(2) The
 individual is not a licensed manufacturer of firearms pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code.

(3) The individual is not a licensed importer of firearms pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code and the regulations issued pursuant thereto.

(4) The individual is the owner of a firearm.

(5) The individual acquired that firearm outside of California.

(6) The individual moved into this state on or after January 1, 1998, in the case of a handgun, or in the case of a firearm that is not a handgun, on or after January 1, 2014, as a resident of this state.

(7) The individual intends to possess that
 handgun within this state on or after January 1, 1998, or in the case of a firearm that is not a handgun, he or she intends to possess that firearm within this state on or after January 1, 2014.

(8) The firearm was not delivered to the individual by a person licensed pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 26700) and Article 2 (commencing with Section 26800) of Chapter 2 of Division 6 of Title 4, who delivered that firearm following the procedures set forth in Section 27540 and Article 1 (commencing with Section 26700) and Article 2 (commencing with Section 26800) of Chapter 2 of Division 6 of Title 4.

(9) The individual, while a resident of this state, had not previously reported ownership of that firearm to the Department of Justice in a manner prescribed by the department that included information concerning the individual and a description of the firearm.

(10) The firearm is not a firearm that is prohibited by any provision listed in Section 16590.

(11) The firearm is not an assault weapon.

(12) The firearm is not a machinegun.

(13) The person is 18 years of age or older.

(14) The firearm is not a .50 BMG rifle.

(15) The firearm is not a destructive device.

(b) For purposes of paragraph (6) of subdivision (a):

(1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), residency shall be determined in the same manner as is the case for establishing residency pursuant to
 Section 12505 of the Vehicle Code.

(2) In the case of a member of the Armed Forces of the United States, residency shall be deemed to be established when the individual was discharged from active service in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 745, Sec. 3.   (AB 809)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

17010.

Use of the term “pistol” is governed by Section 16530.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

17015.

“Pistol converter” means any device or instrument that when installed in or attached to the rear of the slide of a semiautomatic pistol, replaces the backplate, and interferes with the trigger mechanism and thereby enables the pistol to shoot automatically more than one shot by a single function of the trigger. A pistol converter includes, but is not limited to, a pistol converter manufactured using a three-dimensional printer, as defined in Section 29185.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 572, Sec. 4.   (AB 1127)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

17020.

For purposes of this part, a city or county may be considered an applicant’s “principal place of employment or business” only if the applicant is physically present in the jurisdiction during a substantial part of the applicant’s working hours for purposes of that employment or business.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

17030.

As used in this part, “prohibited area” means any place where it is unlawful to discharge a weapon.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

17040.

As used in Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 26350) of Division 5 of Title 4, “public place” has the same meaning as in Section 25850.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 725, Sec. 8.   (AB 144)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

17060.

(a) (1) As used in Sections 25135 and 25145, “residence” means a structure intended or used for human habitation, including, but not limited to, houses, condominiums, rooms, motels, hotels, time-shares, and recreational or other vehicles where human habitation occurs.

(2) As used in Sections 27881, 27882, and 27883, “residence” means a structure intended or used for human habitation, including, but not limited to, houses, condominiums, rooms, motels, hotels, and time-shares, but does not include recreational vehicles or other vehicles where human habitation occurs.

(b) This section
 shall become operative on January 1, 2026.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 2) and added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 542, Sec. 3.   (SB 53)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Operative January 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

17070.

As used in this part, “responsible adult” means a person at least 21 years of age who is not prohibited by state or federal law from possessing, receiving, owning, or purchasing a firearm.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

17080.

Use of the term “revolver” is governed by Section 16530.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

17090.

As used in Sections 16530, 16640, 16650, 16660, 16870, and 17170, Sections 17720 to 17730, inclusive, Section 17740, subdivision (f) of Section 27555, Article 2 (commencing with Section 30300) of Chapter 1 of Division 10 of Title 4, and Article 1 (commencing with Section 33210) of Chapter 8 of Division 10 of Title 4, “rifle” means a weapon designed or redesigned, made or remade, and intended to be fired from the shoulder and designed or redesigned and made or
 remade to use the energy of the explosive in a fixed cartridge to fire only a single projectile through a rifled bore for each single pull of the trigger.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

17110.

As used in Section 26890, “secure facility” means a building that meets all of the following specifications:

(a) All perimeter doorways shall meet one of the following:

(1) A windowless steel security door equipped with both a dead bolt and a doorknob lock.

(2) A windowed metal door that is equipped with both a dead bolt and a doorknob lock. If the window has an opening of five inches or more measured in any direction, the window shall be covered with steel bars of at least one-half of an inch diameter or metal grating of at least nine gauge affixed to the exterior or interior of the
 door.

(3) A metal grate that is padlocked and affixed to the licensee’s premises independent of the door and doorframe.

(4) (A) A windowed or windowless steel door that is equipped with panic hardware that operates a multipoint lock that bolts into the interior frame of the door.

(B) The
 door shall have a latch guard over the bolt closest to the primary locking bolt to protect it from prying or cutting.

(C) If the door is windowed and the window has an opening of five inches or more measured in any direction, the window shall be covered with steel bars of at least one-half of an inch diameter or metal grating of at least nine gauge affixed to the exterior or interior of the door.

(b) All windows are covered with steel bars.

(c) Heating, ventilating, air-conditioning, and service openings are secured with steel bars, metal grating, or an alarm system.

(d) Any metal grates have spaces no larger than six inches wide measured in any
 direction.

(e) Any metal screens have spaces no larger than three inches wide measured in any direction.

(f) All steel bars shall be no further than six inches apart.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 40, Sec. 1.   (AB 584)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

17111.

For purposes of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 29030) of Division 7 of Title 4, use of the term “secure facility” is governed by Sections 29141 and 29142.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

17125.

As used in this part, “Security Exemplar” has the same meaning as in Section 922 of Title 18 of the United States Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

17140.

As used in Sections 16900 and 31910, “semiautomatic pistol” means a pistol with an operating mode that uses the energy of the explosive in a fixed cartridge to extract a fired cartridge and chamber a fresh cartridge with each single pull of the trigger.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

17160.

As used in this part, a “shobi-zue” means a staff, crutch, stick, rod, or pole concealing a knife or blade within it, which may be exposed by a flip of the wrist or by a mechanical action.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

17170.

As used in this part, “short-barreled rifle” means any of the following:

(a) A rifle having a barrel or barrels of less than 16 inches in length.

(b) A rifle with an overall length of less than 26 inches.

(c) Any weapon made from a
 rifle (whether by alteration, modification, or otherwise) if that weapon, as modified, has an overall length of less than 26 inches or a barrel or barrels of less than 16 inches in length.

(d) Any device that may be readily restored to fire a fixed cartridge which, when so restored, is a device defined in subdivisions (a) to (c), inclusive.

(e) Any part, or combination of parts, designed and intended to convert a device into a device defined in subdivisions (a) to (c), inclusive, or any combination of parts from which a device defined in subdivisions (a) to (c), inclusive, may be readily assembled if those parts are in the possession or under the control of the same person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 103, Sec. 6.   (AB 1798)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

17180.

As used in this part, “short-barreled shotgun” means any of the following:

(a) A firearm that is designed or redesigned to fire a fixed shotgun shell and has a barrel or barrels of less than 18 inches in length.

(b) A firearm that has an overall length of less than 26 inches and that is designed
 or redesigned to fire a fixed shotgun shell.

(c) Any weapon made from a shotgun (whether by alteration, modification, or otherwise) if that weapon, as modified, has an overall length of less than 26 inches or a barrel or barrels of less than 18 inches in length.

(d) Any device that may be readily restored to fire a fixed shotgun shell which, when so restored, is a device defined in subdivisions (a) to (c), inclusive.

(e) Any part, or combination of parts, designed and intended to convert a device into a device defined in subdivisions (a) to (c), inclusive, or any combination of parts from which a device defined in subdivisions (a) to (c), inclusive, can be readily assembled if those parts are in the possession or under the control of the same person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 103, Sec. 7.   (AB 1798)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

17190.

As used in Sections 16530, 16640, 16870, and 17180, Sections 17720 to 17730, inclusive, Section 17740, Section 30215, and Article 1 (commencing with Section 33210) of Chapter 8 of Division 10 of Title 4, “shotgun” means a weapon designed or redesigned, made or remade, and intended to be fired from the shoulder and designed or redesigned and made or remade to use the energy of the explosive in a fixed shotgun shell to fire through a smooth bore either a number of projectiles (ball shot) or a single projectile for each pull of the trigger.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 103, Sec. 8.   (AB 1798)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

17200.

As used in this part, a “shuriken” means any instrument, without handles, consisting of a metal plate having three or more radiating points with one or more sharp edges and designed in the shape of a polygon, trefoil, cross, star, diamond, or other geometric shape, for use as a weapon for throwing.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

17210.

As used in Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 33410) of Division 10 of Title 4, “silencer” means any device or attachment of any kind designed, used, or intended for use in silencing, diminishing, or muffling the report of a firearm. The term “silencer” also includes any combination of parts, designed or redesigned, and intended for use in assembling a silencer or fabricating a silencer and any part intended only for use in assembly or fabrication of a
 silencer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

17220.

Use of the term “SKS rifle” is governed by Section 30710.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

17230.

As used in this part, “stun gun” means any item, except a less lethal weapon, used or intended to be used as either an offensive or defensive weapon that is capable of temporarily immobilizing a person by the infliction of an electrical charge.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

17235.

As used in this part, “switchblade knife” means a knife having the appearance of a pocketknife and includes a spring-blade knife, snap-blade knife, gravity knife, or any other similar type knife, the blade or blades of which are two or more inches in length and which can be released automatically by a flick of a button, pressure on the handle, flip of the wrist or other mechanical device, or is released by the weight of the blade or by any type of mechanism
 whatsoever. “Switchblade knife” does not include a knife that opens with one hand utilizing thumb pressure applied solely to the blade of the knife or a thumb stud attached to the blade, provided that the knife has a detent or other mechanism that provides resistance that must be overcome in opening the blade, or that biases the blade back toward its closed position.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

17240.

(a) As used in this part, “tear gas” applies to and includes any liquid, gaseous or solid substance intended to produce temporary physical discomfort or permanent injury through being vaporized or otherwise dispersed in the air. 

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), “tear gas” does not apply to, and does not include, any substance registered as an economic poison as provided in
 Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 12751) of Division 7 of the Food and Agricultural Code, provided that the substance is not intended to be used to produce discomfort or injury to human beings.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

17250.

As used in this part, “tear gas weapon” applies to and includes: 

(a) Any shell, cartridge, or bomb capable of being discharged or exploded, when the discharge or explosion will cause or permit the release or emission of tear gas. 

(b) Any revolver, pistol, fountain pen gun, billy, or other form of device, portable or fixed, intended
 for the projection or release of tear gas, except those regularly manufactured and sold for use with firearm ammunition.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

17270.

As used in this part, an “unconventional pistol” means a firearm with both of the following characteristics: 

(a) It does not have a rifled bore. 

(b) It has a barrel or barrels of less than 18 inches in length or has an overall length of less than 26 inches.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

17280.

As used in this part, “undetectable firearm” means any weapon that meets either of the following requirements: 

(a) After removal of grips, stocks, and magazines, the weapon is not as detectable as the Security Exemplar, by a walk-through metal detector calibrated and operated to detect the Security Exemplar. 

(b) Any major component of
 the weapon, as defined in Section 922 of Title 18 of the United States Code, when subjected to inspection by the types of X-ray machines commonly used at airports, does not generate an image that accurately depicts the shape of the component. Barium sulfate or other compounds may be used in the fabrication of the component.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

17290.

As used in this part, “undetectable knife” means any knife or other instrument, with or without a handguard, that satisfies all of the following requirements: 

(a) It is capable of ready use as a stabbing weapon that may inflict great bodily injury or death. 

(b) It is commercially manufactured to be used as a weapon. 

(c) It is not detectable by a metal detector or magnetometer, either handheld or otherwise, which is set at standard calibration.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

17295.

(a) For purposes of Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 26350) of Division 5 of Title 4, a handgun shall be deemed “unloaded” if it is not “loaded” within the meaning of subdivision (b) of Section 16840. 

(b) For purposes of Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 26400) of Division 5 of Title 4, a firearm that is not a handgun shall be deemed “unloaded” if it is not “loaded” within the meaning of subdivision (b) of Section 16840.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 700, Sec. 8.   (AB 1527)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

17300.

Use of the phrase “unsafe handgun” is governed by Section 31910.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

17310.

As used in this part, “used firearm” means a firearm that has been sold previously at retail and is more than three years old.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

17312.

“Valid state or federal serial number or mark of identification” means either of the following:

(a) A serial number that has been imprinted by a federal licensee authorized to serialize firearms in accordance with federal law, or that has been assigned to a firearm pursuant to Chapter 53 of Title 26 of the United States Code and the regulations issued pursuant thereto.

(b) A serial number or mark of identification issued by the California Department of Justice pursuant to Section 23910 or 29180.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 76, Sec. 9.   (AB 1621)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

17315.

As used in Articles 2 through 5 of Chapter 1 of Division 10 of Title 4, “vendor” means an ammunition vendor.

(History: Amended November 8, 2016, by initiative Proposition 63, Sec. 8.4.)
-------------------------------------------

17320.

For purposes of Section 31360 only, “violent felony” refers to the specific crimes listed in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5, and to crimes defined under the applicable laws of the United States or any other state, government, or country that are reasonably equivalent to the crimes listed in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

17330.

As used in this part, “wallet gun” means any firearm mounted or enclosed in a case, resembling a wallet, designed to be or capable of being carried in a pocket or purse, if the firearm may be fired while mounted or enclosed in the case.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

17340.

(a) As used in this part, “wholesaler” means any person who is licensed as a dealer pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code and the regulations issued pursuant thereto, who sells, transfers, or assigns firearms, or parts of firearms, to persons who are licensed as manufacturers, importers, or gunsmiths pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code,
 or persons licensed pursuant to Sections 26700 to 26915, inclusive, and includes persons who receive finished parts of firearms and assemble them into completed or partially completed firearms in furtherance of that purpose. 

(b) “Wholesaler” shall not include a manufacturer, importer, or gunsmith who is licensed to engage in those activities pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code or a person licensed pursuant to Sections 26700 to 26915, inclusive, and the regulations issued pursuant thereto. A wholesaler also does not include a person dealing exclusively in grips, stocks, and other parts of firearms that are not frames or receivers thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

17350.

As used in this part, “writing pen knife” means a device that appears to be a writing pen but has concealed within it a pointed, metallic shaft that is designed to be a stabbing instrument which is exposed by mechanical action or gravity which locks into place when extended or the pointed, metallic shaft is exposed by the removal of the cap or cover on the device.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

17360.

As used in this part, “zip gun” means any weapon or device that meets all of the following criteria: 

(a) It was not imported as a firearm by an importer licensed pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code and the regulations issued pursuant thereto. 

(b) It was not originally designed to
 be a firearm by a manufacturer licensed pursuant to Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code and the regulations issued pursuant thereto. 

(c) No tax was paid on the weapon or device nor was an exemption from paying tax on that weapon or device granted under Section 4181 and Subchapters F (commencing with Section 4216) and G (commencing with Section 4221) of Chapter 32 of Title 26 of the United States Code, as amended, and the regulations issued pursuant thereto. 

(d) It is made or altered to expel a projectile by the force of an explosion or other form of combustion.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 2. WEAPONS GENERALLY [17500. - 19405.]



  DIVISION 1. MISCELLANEOUS RULES RELATING TO WEAPONS GENERALLY [17500. - 17515.]

17500.

Every person having upon the person any deadly weapon, with intent to assault another, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

17505.

It shall be unlawful for any person, as defined in Section 16970, to advertise the sale of any weapon or device, the possession of which is prohibited by Section 18710, 20110, 30315, 30320, 32625, or 33410, by Article 2 (commencing with Section 30600) of Chapter 2 of Division 10 of Title 4, or by any provision listed in Section 16590, in any newspaper, magazine, circular, form letter, or open publication that is published, distributed, or circulated in this state, or on any billboard, card, label, or other advertising medium, or by means of any other advertising device.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

17510.

(a) Any person who does any of the following acts while engaged in picketing, or other informational activities in a public place relating to a concerted refusal to work, is guilty of a misdemeanor:

(1) Carries concealed upon the person, or within any vehicle which is under the person’s control or direction, any pistol, revolver, or other firearm capable of being concealed upon the person.

(2) Carries a loaded firearm upon the person or within any vehicle that is under the person’s control or direction.

(3) Carries a deadly weapon.

(b) This section shall not be construed to authorize or ratify any picketing or other informational activities not otherwise authorized by law.

(c) The following provisions shall not be construed to authorize any conduct described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a):

(1) Article 2 (commencing with Section 25450) of Chapter 2 of Division 5 of Title 4.

(2) Sections 25615 to 25655, inclusive.

(d) Sections 25900 to 26020, inclusive, shall not be construed to authorize any conduct described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

17512.

It is a misdemeanor for a driver of any motor vehicle or the owner of any motor vehicle, whether or not the owner of the vehicle is occupying the vehicle, to knowingly permit any other person to carry into or bring into the vehicle a firearm in violation of Section 26350.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 725, Sec. 10.   (AB 144)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

17515.

Nothing in any provision listed in Section 16580 prohibits a police officer, special police officer, peace officer, or law enforcement officer from carrying any equipment authorized for the enforcement of law or ordinance in any city or county.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



  DIVISION 2. GENERALLY PROHIBITED WEAPONS [17700. - 17800.]



  CHAPTER 1. Exemptions [17700. - 17745.]

17700.

The provisions listed in Section 16590 do not apply to any antique firearm.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

17705.

(a) The provisions listed in Section 16590 do not apply to any firearm or ammunition that is a curio or relic as defined in Section 478.11 of Title 27 of the Code of Federal Regulations and that is in the possession of a person permitted to possess the items under Chapter 44 (commencing with Section 921) of Title 18 of the United States Code and the regulations issued pursuant thereto. 

(b) Any person prohibited by Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 29610), Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 29800), or Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 29900) of Division 9 of Title 4 of this part, or Section 8100 or 8103 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, from possessing firearms or ammunition who obtains
 title to these items by bequest or intestate succession may retain title for not more than one year, but actual possession of these items at any time is punishable under Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 29610), Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 29800), or Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 29900) of Division 9 of Title 4 of this part, or Section 8100 or 8103 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. Within the year, the person shall transfer title to the firearms or ammunition by sale, gift, or other disposition. Any person who violates this section is in violation of the applicable provision listed in Section 16590.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

17710.

(a) The provisions listed in Section 16590 do not apply to “any other weapon” as defined in subsection (e) of Section 5845 of Title 26 of the United States Code, which is in the possession of a person permitted to possess the weapons under the federal Gun Control Act of 1968 (Public Law 90-618), as amended, and the regulations issued pursuant thereto. 

(b) Any person prohibited by Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 29610), Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 29800), or Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 29900) of Division 9 of Title 4 of this part, or Section 8100 or 8103 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, from possessing these weapons who obtains title to these weapons by bequest or intestate
 succession may retain title for not more than one year, but actual possession of these weapons at any time is punishable under Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 29610), Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 29800), or Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 29900) of Division 9 of Title 4 of this part, or Section 8100 or 8103 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. Within the year, the person shall transfer title to the weapons by sale, gift, or other disposition. Any person who violates this section is in violation of the applicable provision listed in Section 16590. 

(c) The exemption provided by this section does not apply to a pen gun.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

17715.
